Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1496
Landlord; access.

(1) A landlord shall not have the right of access to a mobile home owned by a tenant unless such access is necessary to prevent substantial damage to the mobile home space or is in response to an emergency situation.

(2) A landlord may at reasonable times enter onto a mobile home space in order to inspect the mobile home space, make necessary or agreed repairs or improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, or exhibit the mobile home space to prospective or actual purchasers, mortgagees, tenants, workers, or contractors.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 47.